Hawaii statutes.
[§132D‑16.7] Display
stop order. A county fire chief is authorized to immediately revoke or
suspend any permit issued under section 132D-16 for display of display
fireworks, articles pyrotechnic, or aerial devices within the fire chief's
county for the following reasons:

(1) Adverse climatic or atmospheric conditions;

(2) The issuance of red flag warnings; or

(3) Any other conditions determined to make the
display potentially hazardous to persons or property. [L 2011, c 127, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next